Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201882-138
Willa Cather Historical Building Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Willa Cather Historical Building Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Nebraska State Historical Society. The fund shall consist of any funds appropriated by the Legislature and money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private entities. The fund shall be used to preserve and restore the real property described in section 82-130. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2018, LB379, § 2.
April 5, 2018
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.